Georgia, session 2025_26, HB486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:
(1) As of February 2020, Incheon was home to approximately 3 million residents,
making it the third most populous city in South Korea, following Seoul and Busan;
(2) Incheon is a major port city, serving as a crucial hub for international trade and
maritime commerce as well as the home to Incheon International Airport, one of the
busiest and most advanced airports in the world;
(3) Incheon has been designated as an "English City" and has implemented the "Incheon
Free English Zone" initiative, emphasizing global communication and education;
(4) Incheon has established sister city-state relationships with 39 cities around the world;
and
H. B. 486
- 1 -

LC 44 3048
(5) The State of Georgia recognizes the historical, cultural, and economic importance
of Incheon and commends its contributions to global engagement, commerce, and
cultural exchange.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 1 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding state government, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"50-1-14.
The City of Incheon, South Korea is designated as the official sister city-state of the State
of Georgia."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 486
- 2 -